Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 10. General Provisions.

Sec. 44.62.930.
Teleconferencing.

An agency may use teleconferencing for the benefit or convenience of the parties, the public, or the agency, in connection with a proceeding or act authorized under this chapter if all statutory and constitutional rights of the parties are waived or adequately protected.

Teleconferencing may be used to establish quorums, receive public input, and, if all voting individuals have an opportunity to evaluate all testimony and evidence, to vote on actions.

History.

(§ 7 ch 54 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.62.635

. Renumbered in 2004.

Sec. 44.62.950.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

(§ 1 art I (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.62.650

. Renumbered in 1998.